Utah statutes.
70A-2-607.   Effect of acceptance -- Notice of breach -- Burden of
establishing breach after acceptance -- Notice of claim or litigation to
person answerable over.

(1)  The buyer must pay at the contract rate for any goods accepted.
(2)  Acceptance of goods by the buyer precludes rejection of the goods
accepted and if made with knowledge of a nonconformity cannot be revoked
because of it unless the acceptance was on the reasonable assumption that the
nonconformity would be seasonably cured but acceptance does not of itself
impair any other remedy provided by this chapter for nonconformity.
(3)  Where a tender has been accepted
(a)  the buyer must within a reasonable time after he discovers or should have
discovered any breach notify the seller of breach or be barred from any
remedy; and
(b)  if the claim is one for infringement or the like (Subsection (3) of
Section 70A-2-312) and the buyer is sued as a result of such a breach he must
so notify the seller within a reasonable time after he receives notice of the
litigation or be barred from any remedy over for liability established by the
litigation.
(4)  The burden is on the buyer to establish any breach with respect to the
goods accepted.
(5)  Where the buyer is sued for breach of a warranty or other obligation for
which his seller is answerable over
(a)  he may give his seller written notice of the litigation. If the notice
states that the seller may come in and defend and that if the seller does not
do so he will be bound in any action against him by his buyer by any
determination of fact common to the two litigations, then unless the seller
after seasonable receipt of the notice does come in and defend he is so bound.
(b)  if the claim is one for infringement or the like (Subsection (3) of
Section 70A-2-312) the original seller may demand in writing that his buyer
turn over to him control of the litigation including settlement or else be
barred from any remedy over and if he also agrees to bear all expense and to
satisfy any adverse judgment, then unless the buyer after seasonable receipt
of the demand does turn over control the buyer is so barred.
(6)  The provisions of Subsections (3), (4) and (5) apply to any obligation of
a buyer to hold the seller harmless against infringement or the like
(Subsection (3) of Section 70A-2-312).
